Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.255

Major technology projects and services—Approval.

(1) Prior to making a commitment to purchase, acquire, or develop a major information technology project or service, state agencies must provide a proposal to the agency outlining the business case of the proposed product or service, including the up-front and ongoing cost of the proposal.

(2) Within thirty days of receipt of a proposal, the agency shall approve the proposal, reject it, or propose modifications.

(3) In reviewing a proposal, the agency must determine whether the product or service is consistent with:

(a) The standards and policies developed by the director pursuant to RCW 43.105.054 and 43.105.025; and

(b) The state's enterprise-based strategy.

(4) If a substantially similar product or service is offered by the agency, the director may require the state agency to procure the product or service through the agency, if doing so would benefit the state as an enterprise.

(5) The agency shall provide guidance to state agencies as to what threshold of information technology spending constitutes a major information technology product or service under this section.

[ 2024 c 54 s 10; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 209; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 713. Formerly RCW 43.41A.060.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.